Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,251.05
Person in charge, defined.

Person in charge shall mean the individual who is responsible for the operation of the food establishment and who is present at the establishment or is readily accessible to communicate with employees and the regulatory authority.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 14.